West Virginia, session 2025, HB3444.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:ARTICLE 7. PREVENTION AND CONTROL OF COMMUNICABLE AND OTHER INFECTIOUS DISEASES. §16-3-7. Inflammation of the eyes of the newborn.[Repealed.]§16-3-8. Inflammation of the eyes of the newborn — Duty of those assisting at childbirth to report cases; treatment.[Repealed.]§16-3-9. Inflammation of the eyes of the newborn — Duties of local health officer.[Repealed.]§16-3-10. Inflammation of eyes of newborn — Use of an appropriate medication as prophylactic.[Repealed.]§16-3-11. Same — Duty of clerk of county commission. [Repealed.]§16-3-12. Same — Duties of the state director of health; duties of board of health. [Repealed.]§16-3-13. Same — Offenses; penalties. [Repealed.] The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home